Hawaii statutes.
§805-8 Notice to county attorney or
prosecuting attorney. In all criminal cases had before a district judge
where there has been a commitment as provided in section 805-7, an appeal from
the judgment, or a demand for a jury trial, the judge, forthwith, shall send to
the county attorney or to the prosecuting attorney, as the case may be, notice
of the fact, stating briefly in the notice the nature of the case and action
taken thereon, giving the name of the defendant and the date the records were
sent to the circuit court or the clerk of the supreme court. [L 1921, c 159,
§1; RL 1925, §4012; am L 1932 2d, c 13, §1; RL 1935, §5475; RL 1945, §10775; RL
1955, §257-8; HRS §710-8; am L 1970, c 188, §38; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am
L 2004, c 202, §79; am L 2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next